Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 4

Uniform Common Trust Fund Act

35-4-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Common Trust Fund Act.”

Acts 1953, ch. 148, § 4 (Williams, § 9596.35); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-401.

Law Reviews.

Wills and Fiduciary Powers (Robert L. McMurray), 31 Tenn. L. Rev. 191 (1964).

Collateral References.

Construction of the Uniform Common Trust Fund Act. 64 A.L.R.2d 268.

35-4-102. Bank or trust company establishing common trust funds — Investing in trust funds.

Any bank or trust company qualified to act as fiduciary in this state may establish common trust funds for the purpose of furnishing investments to itself as fiduciary, or to itself and others as cofiduciaries, or to another bank or trust company which may, as such fiduciary or cofiduciary, invest funds that it lawfully holds for investment in interests in the common trust funds, if this investment is not prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree or order creating the fiduciary relationship, and if, in the case of cofiduciaries, the bank or trust company procures the consent of its cofiduciaries to the investment.

Acts 1953, ch. 148, § 1 (Williams, § 9596.32); 1973, ch. 378, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-402.

35-4-103. Accounting for trust funds — Chancery court approval.

Unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, the bank or trust company operating the common trust funds is not required to render a court accounting with regard to the funds, but it may, by application to the chancery court, secure approval of such an accounting on such conditions as the court may establish.

When an accounting of a common trust fund is presented to a court for approval, the court shall assign a date and place for hearing and order notice thereof by:

Publication once a week for three (3) weeks, the first publication to be not less than twenty (20) days prior to the date of hearing, of a notice in a newspaper having a circulation in the county in which the bank or trust company or branch thereof operating the common trust fund is located;

Mailing not less than fourteen (14) days prior to the date of the hearing a copy of the notice to all beneficiaries of the trusts participating in the common trust fund whose names are known to the bank or trust company from the records kept by it in the regular course of business in the administration of the trusts, directed to them at the addresses shown by those records; and

Such further notice if any as the court may order.

Acts 1953, ch. 148, § 2 (Williams, § 9596.33); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-403.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1978).

35-4-104. Uniformity of construction and interpretation.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact it.

Acts 1953, ch. 148, § 3 (Williams § 9596.34); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-404.

35-4-105. Fiduciary relationships to which chapter applicable.

This chapter applies to fiduciary relationships in existence on April 8, 1953, or established after that date.

Acts 1953, ch. 148, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-405.